Wyoming, session 2026, SF0042.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-5-201(a) and 36-5-114(d)(intro)
are amended to read:

SF0042

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0151
18-5-201. Authority vested in board of county
commissioners; inapplicability of chapter to incorporated
cities and towns; mineral resources; private schools.

(a) To promote the public health, safety, morals and
general welfare of the county, each board of county
commissioners may regulate and restrict the location and
use of buildings and structures and the use, condition of
use or occupancy of lands for residence, recreation,
agriculture, industry, commerce, public use and other
nongovernmental purposes in the unincorporated area of the
county,. However, in accordance with all of the following:

(i) As used in this subsection:

(A) "Mineral resources" shall not include
sand, gravel or any other common rock used for construction
or similar uses;

(B) "Unincorporated area" includes
unincorporated areas owned or controlled by a governmental
entity or any lessee or permittee of a governmental entity.

SF0042

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0151
(ii) Nothing in W.S. 18-5-201 through 18-5-208
shall be construed to contravene any zoning authority of
any incorporated city or town or any other federal or state
law prohibiting or limiting county regulation in the
unincorporated area of the county;.

(iii) No zoning resolution or plan shall prevent
any use or occupancy reasonably necessary to the extraction
or production of the mineral resources in or under any
lands subject thereto. Nothing in this subsection shall
prevent a board of county commissioners from enacting a
zoning resolution or plan to prevent or limit any use or
occupancy related to the extraction or production of sand,
gravel or any other common rock used for construction or
similar uses;

(iv) No board of county commissioners shall
require that a land use or physical development be
consistent with a local land use plan unless the applicable
provisions of the local land use plan have been
incorporated into the local zoning regulations;.

SF0042

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0151
(v) Nothing in W.S. 18-5-201 through 18-5-208
shall be construed to allow any board of county
commissioners, through the establishment of minimum lot
size requirements or otherwise, to prevent residential or
agricultural uses authorized for land divisions that are
exempt from subdivision requirements pursuant to W.S.
18-5-303(a)(i);.

(vi) No zoning resolution or plan shall regulate
and restrict the location and use of buildings and
structures and the use, condition of use or occupancy of
lands for the use of a private school as defined in W.S.
21-4-101(a)(iii) in any manner different from a public
school, provided that the private school:

(i)(A) Is certified by the professional
engineer or architect of record for the private school as
being substantially similar to school facility commission
guidelines for education buildings and siting and is
designed to be constructed with appropriate materials,
means and methods;

SF0042

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0151
(ii)(B) Has capacity for fifty (50)
students or more; and

(iii)(C) Is owned and operated by a not for
profit entity.

36-5-114. Leasing for industrial, commercial,
residential and recreational purposes; authority; rental
fees; rules and regulations.

(d) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations
implementing policies, procedures and standards for the
long-term leasing of state lands for industrial, commercial
and recreational purposes under the provisions of W.S.
36-5-114 through 36-5-117, including provisions requiring
compliance with all applicable land use planning and zoning
laws, including compliance with any limitation on land use
imposed by a county under W.S. 18-5-201(a), and permitting
the board to terminate a lease for good cause shown. When
the office of state lands and investments initiates a
request for a proposed leasing of state lands, the office
shall require not less than thirty (30) days notice be
provided:
SF0042

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0151

Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter, amend or impair any lease, contract or other
agreement entered into before July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0042